src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON	_N4311

 ! non possessive forms

+N+Sg+Nom:ыг K ;
+N+Sg+Loc:ыгт K ;
+N+Sg+Lat:гын K ;
+N+Sg+Abl:ыгныл K ;
+N+Sg+Instr:гыл K ;
+N+Sg+Trans:гиг K ;

+N+Du+Nom:гыг K ;
+N+Du+Loc:гыгт K ;
+N+Du+Lat:гыгн K ;
+N+Du+Abl:гыгныл K ;
+N+Du+Instr:гыгтыл K ;

+N+Pl+Nom:гыт K ;
+N+Pl+Loc:гытт K ;
+N+Pl+Lat:гытн K ;

+N+Pl+Lat:гытын K ;
+N+Pl+Abl:гытныл K ;
+N+Pl+Instr:гытыл K ;

 ! possessive forms

+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom:гум K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Loc:гумт K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Lat:гумн K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Abl:гумныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg1+Instr:гумтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxSg1+Nom:гагум K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Loc:гагумт K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Lat:гагумн K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Abl:гагумныл K ;
+N+Du+PxSg1+Instr:гагумтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom:ганум K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Loc:ганумт K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Lat:ганумн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Abl:ганумныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg1+Instr:ганумтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom:гын K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Loc:гынт K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Lat:гынн K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Abl:гынныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg2+Instr:гынтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxSg2+Nom:гагын K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Loc:гагынт K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Lat:гагынн K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Abl:гагынныл K ;
+N+Du+PxSg2+Instr:гагынтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom:ган K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Loc:гант K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat:ганн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abl:ганныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Instr:гантыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom:ганын K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Loc:ганынт K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat:ганынн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abl:ганынныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg2+Instr:ганынтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom:ге K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Loc:гет K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Lat:ген K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Abl:геныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxSg3+Instr:гетыл K ;

+N+Du+PxSg3+Nom:гаге K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Loc:гагет K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Lat:гаген K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Abl:гагеныл K ;
+N+Du+PxSg3+Instr:гагетыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom:ганэ K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Loc:ганэт K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Lat:ганэн K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Abl:ганэныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxSg3+Instr:ганэтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxDu1+Nom:ыгме̄н K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Loc:ыгме̄нт K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Lat:ыгме̄нн K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Abl:ыгме̄нныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu1+Instr:ыгме̄нтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxDu1+Nom:гагме̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Loc:гагме̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Lat:гагме̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Abl:гагме̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxDu1+Instr:гагме̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu1+Nom:ганме̄н K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Loc:ганме̄нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Lat:ганме̄нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Abl:ганме̄нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu1+Instr:ганме̄нтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxDu2+Nom:гын K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Loc:гынт K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Lat:гынн K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Abl:гынныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu2+Instr:гынтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxDu2+Nom:гагы̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Loc:гагы̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Lat:гагы̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Abl:гагы̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxDu2+Instr:гагы̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu2+Nom:ганы̄н K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Loc:ганы̄нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Lat:ганы̄нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Abl:ганы̄нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Instr:ганы̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu2+Nom:ган K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Loc:гант K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Lat:ганн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Abl:ганныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu2+Instr:гантыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxDu3+Nom:ге̄н K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Loc:ге̄нт K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Lat:ге̄нн K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Abl:ге̄нныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxDu3+Instr:ге̄нтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxDu3+Nom:гаге̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Loc:гаге̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Lat:гаге̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Abl:гаге̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxDu3+Instr:гаге̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxDu3+Nom:ганэ̄н K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Loc:ганэ̄нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Lat:ганэ̄нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Abl:ганэ̄нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxDu3+Instr:ганэ̄нтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom:гув K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Loc:гувт K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Lat:гувн K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Abl:гувныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl1+Instr:гувтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxPl1+Nom:гагув K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Loc:гагувт K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Lat:гагувн K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Abl:гагувныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl1+Instr:гагувтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom:ганув K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Loc:ганувт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Lat:ганувн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Abl:ганувныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl1+Instr:ганувтыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom:гы̄н K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Loc:гы̄нт K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Lat:гы̄нн K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Abl:гы̄нныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl2+Instr:гы̄нтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxPl2+Nom:гагы̄н K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Loc:гагы̄нт K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Lat:гагы̄нн K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Abl:гагы̄нныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl2+Instr:гагы̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom:ганы̄н K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Loc:ганы̄нт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Lat:ганы̄нн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abl:ганы̄нныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Instr:ганы̄нтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom:ган K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Loc:гант K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Lat:ганн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abl:ганныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl2+Instr:гантыл K ;

+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom:ганыл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Loc:ганылт K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Lat:ганылн K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Abl:ганылныл K ;
+N+Sg+PxPl3+Instr:ганылтыл K ;

+N+Du+PxPl3+Nom:гага̄ныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Loc:гага̄нылт K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Lat:гага̄нылн K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Abl:гага̄нылныл K ;
+N+Du+PxPl3+Instr:гага̄нылтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom:гананыл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Loc:гананылт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat:гананылн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl:гананылныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Instr:гананылтыл K ;

+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom:га̄ныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Loc:га̄нылт K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat:га̄нылн K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl:га̄нылныл K ;
+N+Pl+PxPl3+Instr:га̄нылтыл K ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
